District of Columbia statutes.
32-1542.04

Compliance.

(a)

The Director of Employment Services (“Director”) shall assign from the workforce in the Workers’ Compensation office a staff equal to 5 full time equivalents to the enforcement of employer compliance with Workers’ Compensation requirements, including enforcing existing law and referring cases to the Office of the Attorney General for prosecution.

(b)

The Director shall file a semi-annual compliance report with the Council by March 31st and by September 30th, which shall contain detailed and comprehensive information about the compliance enforcement activities during the preceding 6 months.

July 1, 1980, D.C. Law 3-77, § 43d
as added Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 1102(e), 51 DCR 8441
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1102(f) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1102(f) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).